Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,171
Applications, filings, and reports; public documents; exception.

All applications, filings, and reports required under the Health Maintenance Organization Act shall be treated as public documents except those which are trade secrets or privileged or confidential quality assurance, commercial, or financial information other than any annual financial statement that may be required under section 44-32,134.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 80.